District of Columbia statutes.
3-731

Commission on Fathers, Men, and Boys.

The Commission on Fathers, Men, and Boys (“Commission”) is established to advise the Mayor, the Council, and the public on issues and needs of fathers, men, and boys in the District of Columbia.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 1072, 61 DCR 9990

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of chapter, see §§ 1072-1074 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of chapter, see §§ 1072-1074 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of chapter, see §§ 1072-1074 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).